Utah statutes.
62A-11-108.   Office designated as criminal justice agency -- Access by IV-D agencies to motor vehicle and law enforcement data through the office.

(1)  The office is designated as a criminal justice agency for the purpose of requesting and obtaining access to criminal justice information, subject to appropriate federal, state, and local agency restrictions governing the dissemination of that information.

(2)  All federal and state agencies conducting activities under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act shall have access through the office to any system used by this state to locate an individual for purposes relating to motor vehicles or law enforcement.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

